Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2277.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The definition of "standby guardian" in section 5602 of Title 23 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:§ 5602. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *"Standby guardian." A person named by a designator to assume the duties of coguardian or guardian of a minor and whose authority becomes effective upon the incapacity, debilitation and consent, long-term or indefinite absence of, or death of the 123456789101112131415161718 minor's parent.* * *Section 2. Section 5612(a) of Title 23 is amended to read:§ 5612. Petition for approval of a designation.(a) General rule.--A petition for court approval of a designation under this chapter may be made at any time by filing with the court a copy of the designation. If the triggering event has not occurred on or before the time of filing, only the designator may file the petition. If the triggering event has occurred on or before the time of filing, the standby guardian named in the designation may file the petition, and the petition shall also contain one of the following:(1) A determination of the designator's incapacity.(2) A determination of the designator's debilitation and the designator's signed and dated consent.(3) Any documentation demonstrating the designator's long-term or indefinite absence.[(3)] (4) A copy of the designator's death certificate.* * *Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2277PN2979 - 2 - 1234567891011121314151617181920